District of Columbia statutes.
39-401

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Arena Stage project” means the planning, development, acquisition, and construction of theater facilities and ancillary facilities to be located at 1101 6th Street, S.W., Washington, D.C. (Square 472, Lot 123).

(2)

“Eligible organization” means an organization with real property described in § 47-1002(6), (7), (10), or (19) that has a signed lease for at least 10 years to carry out the purposes described in those paragraphs.

(3)

“Capital costs” means the costs of materials and supplies for the construction, rehabilitation, renovation, or preparation of architectural or engineering plans for a physical facility located in the District.

(5)

“Economic assistance” means a loan, grant, investment, or other form of expenditure of District monies.

History

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-271, § 2, 52 DCR 820